Utah statutes.
53-10-406.   DNA specimen analysis -- Bureau responsibilities.
(1)  The bureau shall:
(a)  store all DNA specimens received and other physical evidence obtained
from analysis of those specimens;
(b)  analyze the specimens to establish the genetic profile of the donor or to
otherwise determine the identity of persons or contract with other qualified
public or private laboratories to conduct the analysis;
(c)  maintain a criminal identification data base containing information
derived from DNA analysis;
(d)  utilize the specimens to create statistical population frequency data
bases, provided that genetic profiles or other information in a population
frequency data base may not be identified with specific individuals;
(e)  ensure that the DNA identification system does not provide information
allowing prediction of genetic disease or predisposition to illness; and
(f)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act, establishing procedures for obtaining, transmitting, and
analyzing DNA specimens and for storing and destroying DNA specimens and other
physical evidence and criminal identification information obtained from the
analysis.
(2)  Procedures for DNA analysis may include all techniques which the
Department of Public Safety determines are accurate and reliable in
establishing identity, including but not limited to, analysis of DNA, antigen
antibodies, polymorphic enzymes, or polymorphic proteins.
(3) (a)  In accordance with Section 63G-2-305, all DNA specimens received
shall be classified as protected.
(b)  The Department of Public Safety may not transfer or disclose any DNA
specimen, physical evidence, or criminal identification information obtained,
stored, or maintained under this section, except under its provisions.
(4)  Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection 63G-2-202(1), the department
may deny inspection if it determines that there is a reasonable likelihood
that the inspection would prejudice a pending criminal investigation.
(5)  The department shall adopt procedures governing the inspection of
records, DNA specimens, and challenges to the accuracy of records.  The
procedures shall accommodate the need to preserve the materials from
contamination and destruction.
(6) (a)  Whenever a court reverses the conviction, judgment, or order that
created an obligation to provide a DNA specimen, the person who provided the
specimen may request destruction of the specimen and any criminal
identification record created in connection with that specimen.
(b)  Upon receipt of a written request for destruction pursuant to this
section and a certified copy of the court order reversing the conviction,
judgment, or order, the Department of Public Safety shall destroy any specimen
received from the person, any physical evidence obtained from that specimen,
and any criminal identification records pertaining to the person, unless the
department determines that the person has otherwise become obligated to submit
a DNA specimen as a result of a separate conviction or juvenile adjudication
for an offense listed in Section 53-10-403.
(7)  The department is not required to destroy any item of physical evidence
obtained from a DNA specimen if evidence relating to another person subject to
the provisions of Sections 53-10-404 and 53-10-405 would as a result be
destroyed.
(8)  A DNA specimen, physical evidence, or criminal identification record may
not be affected by an order to set aside a conviction, except under the
provisions of this section.
(9)  If funding is not available for analysis of any of the DNA specimens
collected under this part, the bureau shall store the collected specimens
until funding is made available for analysis through state or federal funds.
